Washington statutes.
RCW 30A.42.260

Reports.

(1) An office of an alien bank shall file the following reports with the director within such times and in such form as the director shall prescribe by rule:

(a) A statement of condition of the office;

(b) A capital position report of the office;

(c) A consolidated statement of condition of an alien bank.

(2) An office of an alien bank shall publish such reports as the director by rule may prescribe.

(3) An alien bank operating a bureau in this state shall file a copy of the alien bank's annual financial report with the director as soon as possible following the end of each fiscal year and shall file such other material as the director may prescribe by rule.

[ 1994 c 92 s 98; 1973 1st ex.s. c 53 s 26. Formerly RCW 30.42.260.]